Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1688, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 355, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1688), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1688. A. No license shall be issued for longer than
one (1) year, and all licenses shall expire on the last day in the
birth month of the licensee. A license may be renewed upon
application and payment of fees thirty (30) days preceding or
following the date the license is due. Licenses renewed more than
thirty (30) days following the date of expiration may be renewed

only upon application and payment of all required fees and payment
of any penalty for late renewal established by the Construction
Industries Board and upon compliance with any applicable continuing
education requirements established by the Board and the Electrical
License Act. No penalty for late renewal shall be charged to any
holder of a license which expires while the holder is in military
service, if an application for renewal is made within one (1) year
following the service discharge of the holder.
B. No journeyman or contractor license shall be renewed unless
the licensee has completed the required hours of continuing
education, pursuant to the Electrical License Act and as determined
and approved by the Committee of Electrical Examiners and approved
by the Construction Industries Board.
C. Any license that remains expired for longer than one (1)
year shall not be renewed but shall be reinstated pursuant to this
subsection when compliant with all license requirements. To obtain
the license formerly held, the former license holder shall be
required to submit a reinstatement application provided by the Board
and either retest or satisfy all of the following:
1. Submit a complete reinstatement application to the Board;
2. Pay the standard license renewal fee and a reinstatement
penalty fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00);
3. Submit certification of completion within the preceding
twelve-month period of all continuing education approved by the
Committee of Electrical Examiners as follows:
a. if the applicant has satisfied the continuing
education requirements required for license renewal
within the preceding thirty-six (36) months, no
additional continuing education shall be required, or
b. if the license has been expired for more than thirty-
six (36) months, the applicant shall complete twelve
(12) hours of continuing education for each full
thirty-six-month period the license has remained
expired, not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours; and
4. Submit an original sworn affidavit or other verification
satisfactory to the Board that the applicant has not been subject to
final disciplinary action that would preclude licensure and has not
ENR. H. B. NO. 3673 Page 2

been convicted of a crime that has a direct bearing on the
applicant’s fitness to practice as an electrician.
D. A licensee shall be exempt from the continuing education
requirements for license renewal for three (3) years from the date
the licensee passed his or her current licensing exam.
E. A licensee whose license was reinstated through the option
of completing the required hours of continuing education in lieu of
retesting after being expired for more than one (1) year shall, for
the first timely submitted license renewal of the reinstated
license, complete the continuing education required pursuant to this
section for renewing his or her license within thirty-six (36)
months beginning from the date of the last verified continuing
education course completed for reinstatement of an expired license.
F. An apprentice registration certificate shall be issued for
one (1) year, at which time the apprentice may reregister upon
meeting the requirements of the Construction Industries Board and
paying the renewal fee.
D. G. A student apprentice registration certificate shall be
issued for the registrant’s school year. A student apprentice
registration expires on the last day of the registrant’s school
year, at which time the apprentice may reregister upon meeting the
requirements of the Construction Industries Board and paying the
renewal fee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3673 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3673 Page 4